Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1805
Conversational artificial intelligence service; suicidal ideation or self-harm; protocol.

An operator shall adopt a protocol for the conversational artificial intelligence service to respond to user prompts regarding suicidal ideation or self-harm that includes, but is not limited to, making reasonable efforts to provide a response to the user that refers them to crisis service providers such as a suicide hotline, crisis text line, or other appropriate crisis services.

Laws 2026, LB525, § 16.
July 1, 2027